print/tex/TeX3.14/contrib/tex/hyphen/hyphen.german.tex
% These are german hyphen patterns (major version)
% for use with TeX generated at
%              Rechenzentrum Ruhr-Universitaet Bochum
%              Universitaetsstrasse 150
%              D-4630 Bochum 1
%              West Germany
% as of 1988-10-10.
% Copyright Rechenzentrum der Ruhr-Universitaet Bochum 1988
%
% General permission for non-profit use is granted.
%
% For commercial use, contact the above address.
% (c/o Norbert Schwarz)
%
\patterns{%
.aa6l
.ab3a4s
.ab3ei
.abi2
.ab3it
.ab1l
.ab1r
.ab3u
.ad3o4r
.ai8de
.ai8r
.al7it
.alti6
.ampe8
.ana3c
.and8e
.an1e
.an1s
.an8tar
.an7tr
.ap1p
.ar7r
.ar6sc
.ar6ta
.ar6tei
.as2z
.aue6
.au2f1
.au2s
.aus3p
.be5erb
.be3na
.ber6t5r
.bi8en.
.bie6r5
.bim6s5t
.bo8s7k
.brot3
.bru6s
.ceri8
.ch8
.che6f5
.cre8me.
.da8c
.da2r
.dar7e
.dar5in
.dar5u
.dau7
.de8er
.de8men
.den6ka
.de7ran
.de5r6en
.de5sk
.des6pe
.de3sz
.dia1
.dias4
.dien4
.dvo7
.dy2s1
.ebe8r7
.ehren5
.ei7e
.eine6
.ei6n5eh
.ei8nen
.ei8re.
.ei8s7t
.el8fei
.el8fu
.en8da
.en6der
.en6d5r
.en3k4
.en8t7a8
.en8t7ei
.en8t7erb
.en4t3r
.epo1
.ep7o8d
.er6ban
.er6b5ei
.er6bla
.er6d5um
.ere7c
.er3ei
.er5er
.er3in
.er8in.
.er1k
.er3o4b
.erwi5s
.er3zw
.es1p
.es8t
.est7ri
.eu7t
.ex1a2
.ex3em
.ext8
.fah8l
.fal6sc
.fe6sta
.fi8che
.fini8
.flu4g3
.furch8
.ga6ner
.ge3n4a
.ger8a
.ges6
.gi8de.
.gi8e
.halb5
.halbe6
.hal6br
.haup4
.haupt5
.hau4t
.heima6
.he4r3e
.he7rer
.her6za
.he5x
.hi8e
.hin3
.hir6sc
.ho4c
.ho6la
.ho8met
.hy5o
.ima6ge
.in1
.in8an.
.ine8
.ingeni7
.ini6
.is7an
.is5c
.it8zu
.kal6k5o
.kasch7n
.ka8t7i8o
.ki6e
.kop4f
.lab6br
.le8ar
.liie6
.li8ve.
.lo6s5k
.los7t
.lou7is.
.lu7es
.lu7str
.ma5d
.ma8is
.men7t
.mi4t1
.na7im
.nan8t
.ne8i
.ni7ge
.no6top
.ob1l
.ob6st5e
.oe8
.oi7
.ole5
.or3c
.ori7
.ort6s5e
.ost3a8
.ost7end
.ou8t7e
.pe4re
.pe3ts
.ph6
.po8str
.po8w
.pris7c
.puni7e
.rang7s
.rau4m3
.re5an
.re7cha
.rei8s7c
.re1o
.rich7te
.ro8q
.ru5the
.sali7e
.sch8
.se8al
.sel8ba
.se5n6h
.se5ra
.si2e
.spi6ke
.st8
.sto8re
.sy2n
.tab6
.ta8gr
.ta8ke.
.tan6kl
.ta8th
.te6e
.tehe7
.te8str
.th8
.the7in
.ti8eng
.ti8me
.to6der
.to8nin
.to8q
.ty8per
.um1
.un1
.une6
.ur7ang
.ur1c
.ur5en
.ve6rin
.vora8
.wah6l5
.wa8les
.wal7t
.we8ges
.wi8e
.wo6r
.wor3a
.wun4s
.yon8
.zei8s7c
.zi4e
.zin8st
.zuch8
.zucht7
aa8b
aa1c
aa2gr
aal5e
aa7le.
a7an.
aa6r5a
aar7k
aa7ro
a5arti
7aas
aa2s1t
aat2s
6a7ba
abais8
ab3art
1abdr
6abel
ab5erk
ab5err
ab5esse
1abf
1abg
ab1ir
1abko
a1bl
ab1la
5ablag
ab1lu
abma5c
3abn
ab1ra
ab1re
5a6brec
ab8rer
ab1ro
ab1s
ab8sk
7absp
3abtei
ab1ur
1abw
5abze
1abzu
8acc
a4ce.
a8ced
a7cek
a5chal
a5chan
ach5art
ach3au
a1che
a7che.
a8ch7ec
ach7ein
a7ch8en.
a8ch7ent
ach6er.
a6ch5erf
a8ch7erh
a1chi
ach7ins
ach1l
ach3m
ach5n
a1cho
ach3re
ach7su
ach7ter
acht7o
a1chu
ach1w
a7ci
ack1o
a7cl
a7co
a1d
a6d5ac
ada8me
ad3ant
a7d8ar
5addi
8a7de.
a8d7ein
adelei8n
ade5o8
adi5en
1adj
5adle
ad1op
a2dre
3adres
adt5
1adv
a1e2d
a7els
a1er.
a7erd
a7erg
1ae7ro
ae7t
8afa
af7akti
a2f1an
a2f1au
a6fentl
a2f1ex
af8fl
8afft
8afi
af7le
af7rat
af5rau
af1re
1afri
af8tak
af6tra
aft5re
8afu
a6f5um
ag5abe
ag7abt
ag7au
3a4gent
ag7esse
8agl
a5gla
ag5las
a8g1lo
a1gn
ag2ne
ag7ny
1a2gog
ag7rau
ag8sen
a6g5und
a7gy
a1ha
ah8at
a1he
a7he.
ah5ein
a4h3erh
a1hi
ahi8e
ahl1a
ah1le
ah4m3ar
ah1mu
ahn1a
a5ho
ahra6
ahr5ab
ah1re
ah8r7ei
ahren8s
ahre4s3
ah7ri
ah1ru
aht7a
a1hu
ah7w
ai7a
ai8as
ai3d2s
ai1e
aif6
a7ig.
ai7g8n
7aigr
ai7ke
a7ind
a3inse
ain8t
ai4re.
a5isch.
a3ismu
ais6n
aiso6
a7ist.
aiti7e
ai7tr
a7iv.
a7ivl
a1j
1akad
a4kade
7akc
a1ke
a8kes
a1ki
1akko
ak8ly
a7kn
8akon
8akri
5akro1
ak7str
akt7s
a1la
a7lac
al7adm
a7lal
3alarm
a7lat
al7aug
alb5la
alb3st4
3album
al1c
al8dam
ald7inn
a1le
a6l5e6be
a4l3ein
a8l7el
a7len.
a8l7eng
a8l7erb
a6lert
7alerz
5a6l5eth
1algi
al4gli
a8linf
a8linsp
al3int
alizi7e
al4lab
al4l3ar
alle3g
all7ersc
a1lo
a6l5ob
alo8no
al6schm
alt7ak
al4the
altist5
al4t3re
al8t7run
a1lu
alu5i
a6lur
alu1t
al7ute
ama8sta
a6mate
8ame.
a6meise
a7mer.
7a8mero
am6m5ei
am8m7esse
am2n
amo8n7
amp4f3a
am8schl
am6schw
ams7p
am2ta
a1mu
a3nac
a1nad
anadi5e
an3ako
an5alg
an3alp
3analy
an3ame
a7nan
an7ant
an3ara
a1nas
an5asti
a1nat
anat7s
a8n7az
and7arm
an8d7ent
ander5a
ande4s3
7aneb
an1ec
an5eis
an1e2k
a8n7e8p
4aner.
a6n5erd
a6n5erke
an8err
1anfa
7anfo
7anfr
3angab
an3gli
ang6lis
an2gn
3angri
ang5sal
ang5t6
ani5g
ani4ka
an5i8on
an1kl
an6kno
an4kro
1anl
anma5c
anmar4
an8n7as
an7ne
anne4s3
a1no
5a6n1o2d
5a6n3oma
an7oph
5a6nord
1anr
an7sau
5ansic
an4soz
3anspr
an1st
5anstal
an1s2z
ant7a8re
5antenn
an1th
3antra
ant7ros
a5ny
an4z3ed
5anzeig
5anzieh
3anzug
ao8ku
a1os
aot8
a7ot.
a7ou
a1pa
apa7ro
ap8e
a8ped
3apfel
aphe8
aph7el.
a2ph1t
a1pi
ap7lak
a7plo
apo1c
apo1s
a6poste
a6poth
1appa
ap1pr
ap7pu
a1pr
ap6s7a
a1ra
a4r3af
a7r8ak
ar3all
a8r7ang
ar7anw
ara8s7c
3arbei
2arbt
ar1c
2a1re
a8r3ein
a8r7enc
a8r7erb
a8r7erg
ar2gl
ar8gn
2a1ri
ari5es
ari8fo
a8rins
a7riu
ar6les
ar4nan
aro7a
ar7ob.
aroca8
ar5o6ch
ar1o2d
a1rol
aron8n
ar3ony
a8ror
a3ros
ar5ox
arr7eis
ar6schl
ar7sh
8artei
art5eig
ar8t7ram
ar6t5ri
a1ru
ar7usi
a1ry
1arzt
ar8zw
asa7b8
asa7t8
a6schec
asch5l
asch3m
a6schn
asch7ra
asch7ru
8ase
a8s7ek
asen7k
a3s4hi
8a7sim
8asis
a8s7oh
as1pa
a8steb
ast8el
as5tev
1asth
a6stoc
a1str
a7stra
ast3re
a8strol
asu8s
a1ta
ata5c
ata7g
ata5pl
a7t8ar
at7auf
a1te
ate8i
at7eid
at7eig
a6teli
aten5a
ate5ran
a1th
at3hal
a7then
1athl
4a1ti
atini8t
ati8san
5atlant
3atlas
5atmen.
3atmun
a1to
a6t5ops
ato6ra
a6t5ort
6a1tr
a6t5ru
at2t1h
8a1tu
atz1w
au1a
au6bre
auch5a
au8chent
au1e
aue4l
5aufent
7auffa
3aufga
1aufn
auf1t
3auftr
au7ge
3auge.
aug7sp
au7ie
8auj
au4kle
aul8le
6aum
aum5p
8aun
au8nio
au7r
aure7u
1ausb
au7schl
au8scho
ausch5w
7ausd
1ausf
1ausg
au8sin
7aussag
aus8se.
au4sta
aus7trat
aus5tri
7ausv
1ausw
1ausz
8aute
au1th
1auto
autsch7l
8auty
8auv
au8ve.
a1v
ave5r6a
ave7r8e
aver6i
a1w
a8way
a6wes
awi7e
a8wr
a1x
ax8an
a8xf
a8xh
a2xia
a6xio
a8xn
a8xp
7a8xt
a1ya
ay7et
aysi7e
a1z
aze7is
azi5er.
a8zq
1ba
b8aa
8b7a8del
ba8dj
ba8e
ba7io
bak7r
ba1na
b7ander
ban6kl
ban8kr
ban8q
ba5ot
bardi8e
bardi6n
ba1ro
ba8seb
b8a7si
basten6
bau3sp
2b1b
b2bli
bb7s
6b1c
2b1d
1be
be1a
b7ebb
be1ch
8b7echt
8b7ecke.
be5el
be1en
bee8rei
be5eta
bef2
8beff
be1g2
bei7b
bei7g8
bei8ge.
be7inhal
bei1s
6b5eisen
beit8e
bei3tr
b8el
be8l7a8m
be8let
belle6n5
belu3t
7bena
be3nac
bend6o
be6n5ers
be6nerw
ben7k
be4nor
ben4s5e6
ben7t
be1o2
be6pa
b8er.
be1ra
be8rab
be8rac
ber7am
bere8g
ber7ege
ber8g7ab
ber8gan
ber1r
bes8c
bes7erb
bes5erh
be7slo
bes2p
be6spu
be5tha
bet5sc
be1un
be1ur
8bex
be6zwec
2b1f
bfe6st5e
bf8l
2b1g2
bga2s5
bge1
2b1h
bhole6
1bi
bi7ac
bi8af
bi8ank
bi1bl
bi7dj
b6ie
bieb8
bi1el
bi8el.
bi7ent
bi7es.
bi1la
bi1na
bini8e
bi4nok
bi5str
bi6stu
bi7tr
bit4t5r
b1j
2b1k2
b6la.
8b1lad
6blag
8blam
7blat
b8latt
3blau.
b6lav
3b8le.
7blea
b1leb
b1led
8b1leg
8b1leh
8b7leid
8bleih
b3lein
blei3s
ble4m3o
bl8i
6blich
2blig
8b7lin.
b4lind
8bling
b2lio
bli8q
b8lis.
5blit
b4litz
b1loh
8b1los
5blum
4blun
blut3a
blut5sc
2b1m
2b1n
1bo
bob7s
bo1ch
bo8che
bo5d6s
boe5
8boff
bo7in
8b7onk
bo1ra
b1ort
bo7ru
bour8n
2b1p2
b1q
1br
br8a
b8ra.
brail6
b8rak
bra8q
b8rasa
brast8
bra8th
b8rax
b8re.
bre4a
b5red
8b7ref
8b5riem
b6riga
6b5rit
bro1s
b1rup
b2ruz
2bs
b2s1ar
b1sc
bs3erl
bs7err
bs3erz
bs6ku
b8s7ob
b8sof
b1s2p
bst7anb
b7stet
bst1h
b7stis
b7st8ra
bs7treu
b7st8ro
bs4zi
2b1t
b2t1h
1bu
bu7char
bu7e
bug7
bu1ie
bu7in
bul6k
bu7tad
6b1v
2b1w
1by1
by6te.
2b1z
bzi1s
1ca
ca7g6
cail8
ca7in
ca7issa
calmet8
cami8
ca7na
can8nes
ca8pe.
ca6re
ca7ro
ca5y
c1c
1ce
8cej
celi4c
celich5
7cent
7cer
2ch.
ch7ab.
1chae
cha8ge
ch1ah
ch3akt
cha6mer
8chanl
8chanz
5chara
3chari
cha8se
5chato
cha7ts
ch7auf.
8chc
1chef
6chei
ch3eil
ch3eis
chen7a
che8rinn
che7t8s
8ch7ex
6chf
6chins
8chj
chl6
5chlor
6ch2m
6chn6
5cho.
8chob
8ch7orc
7chori
8chp
ch3ren
ch6res
ch7rod
4chs
4cht
cht5ha
cht3hi
5chthon
ch6tin
cht7ruh
6chuh
chu6la
6ch3unt
chut6t
1chy
8chz
1ci
ci7d8
cier8g
ci8s
ci7te7
ci5tr
c7jo
c2k
2ck.
8cka
ck7aa
ck7af
ck7a8m
ck7auf
ck1ei
ck7ese
4ckh
ck7ink
ck3l
ck3n
cko8f
ck1r
2cks
ck7ski
c2l
clet8
clo7c
1co
co7ch
co8de.
co7ir
co8k
co8le.
co8ler
colle8g
comtes8
con6ne
8cop
co8pe
co8re.
cos6t
co8te
1c6r
cre8p
creton8
cros8
7c8sa
c1t
cti8o
ctur8
1cu
c7we
1cy
c8ze
1da
8d7aal
8daas
2dabg
6dabt
6dabw
da7dr
da8gn
da2gr
dal8br
6d5alk
da7ma
8d5amt
d8a7na
da8nan
dana7u
dan6ce.
dani5er
2danl
danla6
6dans
8danzi
6danzu
d1ap
da2r1a8
2d1arb
4d3arc
2d1art
8darz
das8h
da8te.
2d1auf
7d8aul
da7um.
2d1aus
2d1b
2d1c
dca8
dcre8
2d1d
d5de
d3d2h
1de
6deal
de7als
de5an
de5ar
de8ca
de3cha
de1e
de8er.
defe6
6deff
de7ho
2d1ehr
5d4eic
de5isc
de7ism
de7ist.
7dek
del7ach
del6s5e
de4mag
8demp
demu8
de8m7un
de8nep
den7g
8d7enge.
8d7engen
deni8
de8n7o8s
den8s7tau
den7th
de5o6d
2deol
d7ept
de7ral
de5ram
8derdb
der8ec
der5ein
derf8
8d7erhi
d7erneu
de8rot
der1r
der5um
de4s3am
de4s3an
de8sar
de4sau
de6sil
de4sin
de8sor
des1p
de6spo
des7pot
de4spr
dest7alt
de7sti
de2su
8d7eul
de7um
de5us.
de7w
2d1f
df2l
2d1g
2d1h
7dhal.
d8hi.
1di
di5ara
dice5
di3chr
7did
dido8
di5ena
di7enh
di7er.
dif7f
di5gn
di1la
di8me.
di1n8a
8dind
dinet8
6d7inf
4d3inh
2d1ins
8d7int
di5o6d
di7o8ri
di3p4t
di7re
di8s7ag
di8s7en
dis1p
di5s8per
di7sth
di6s5to
dis5tra
di8tal
di8tan
di8tin
diu8
d1j
6dje
2dju
2d1k
2d1l
dli8ne
d8lk
2d1m
2d1n6
dnje6
1do
do7ar
8d7oh
doh8r7
doi8
do7is
6d5ony
do8pe.
do3ran
6d7ord
dor8f7a
8d1org
6d5ort
dor4t3h
7dose
do6ste
dot7an
6doth
7dothel
dot7t8e
do7x
2d1p2
dr6
7d8ra.
1drah
8d7rahm
8d7rak
dra8ke.
d5rand
6dre.
2d1rec
5d6reck
d7rede
4dreg
4d3reic
8drem
6d1ren
2drer
8d7res.
6d5rh
1dria
d1ric
7d8rie
drie8s
8d7rind
d8rio
droi6
dro5x
1dru
8drut
2ds
8ds.
d6san
dsat8
dsatz7
d1sc
5d6scha.
7d8schak
5dschik
d7schn
d7se
ds8ei
ds7eng
8dsl
d1sp
d4spak
d8spas
d8s7pe
ds2po
d1st
ds7tal
d8s7tin
2dt
d1ta
d1te
d1ti
d1to
dt1s6
d1tu
1du
du7als
du7ar
du1b6
du1e
duf4t3r
4d3uh
du5ie
du7in
8duml
8d7umw
dun8a
2d1und
6d5unt
dur8c
durch3
6d5url
6dursa
8durt
du1s
du8schr
dus8t
2d1v
2d1w
dwo7ra
dy7i
8dyni
2d1z
ea4ben
e1ac
e1ah
e8ak.
e1akt
e1al.
e7a8la
eal7ak
e7alb
e7alei
e5alf
e1alg
e5a8lin
e1alk
e3all
e5alp
e7alr
e3alt
e7alv
e5alw
e7alz
e1am
e8amu
ea7na
e7anb
e1and
ea6nim
eannet8
e7apl
e1ar.
e7arb
e8ard
e5arf
ear7g
e1ark
e5arm
e7art
e7arw
e7arz
e7ass
e2at
ea5t6l
eat7s
e5att
e6au.
e8aufo
e1aus
e1b
eba7i
e6b5am
ebe8reg
eb4lie
ebse8
eb8seh
eb4ser
eb4s3in
ec7a8
e7chai8
ech7amt
e1che
e8ch7erz
e1chi
ech3m
ech3n
ech1r
ech8s7end
ech7ser
e1chu
ech7w
eck5an
e5cl
e1d
ed8ap
ed7au.
edoni5e
ed7ria
ee3a
ee3e
e1ei
ee8is.
eei4s3t
e8el.
eel7b
ee6lend
e1ell
ee8n7a8
ee7ra
eera8g
e1erd
ee5r6e
ee8r7eng
eere8s5
eer7z
ee6tat
ee7u8
e1ex
e8f7e8b
efeuil8
ef8f7a
3effek
ef4fli
ef2fr
e1fl
e1fr
ef3rom
ege6ra
eglo6si
e8g7od
1egy
e1ha
e6h5ach
eh5ans
eh7auf
e1he
ehen8g
eher8an
e1hi
ehir8
ehl3a
eh7lam
eh1le
ehl7ein
eh1mu
ehn5ec
e1ho
ehr1a
eh1re
eh1ri
eh1ru
ehr5um
eh7tr
e1hu
eh1w
e1hy
ei1a
eia6s
ei6bar
eich3a
eich5r
ei4dar
ei6d5ei
ei3d4sc
ei1e
8eifen
3eifri
1eig7n
8eil.
eil1d
ei6mab
ei8mag
ein1a2
ei8nal
ei8nat
ein7eng
ei8n7erh
ei8n7ess
ein1g
e8ini
ein1k
ei6n5od
ei4nor
ei1o
eio8b
ei8ot
ei7pf
e1irr
ei5ru
ei8sab
ei6s5ent
ei8sk
ei5spr
ei4t3al
eit3ar
eit1h
ei6thi
ei8tho
eit8s7amt
ei6t5um
e1j
e8jk
1ekd
e1ke
7ekeln
e1ki
e1k2l
ek7lip
e1kn
ekni4
ek8tau
e7k8w
e7ky
e1la
8elad
ela8e
el7af
el8ag
el7ak
e2l1al
el7ame
6elan
e6lanf
el3arm
e6l3art
5e6lasti
e6lauge
el7bla
e1le
elea8s
6elef
ele6h
e6l5ehe
e8l7eif
1elek
e8lel
3eleme
e6lemen
el5epi
e4l3err
e6l5ersc
ele1s2
el7eta
el8f7ak
elf2l
7elfm
elg2
elgi7er.
7elid
e6l5ins
elizi7e
4e1lo
e4l3ofe
el7ora
el5te
el8t7erf
5eltern
e1lu
elut2
7e8mai
7emanz
em8dei
emen7ta
em7entg
e7met
e8meto
em8m7ei
4emo
emoi8re.
emo5s
1empf
7emps
1empt
1emto
e1mu
emurk4
emurks5
e7na.
en5a6ben
en7ace
en5achs
en5ack
e1nad
enadi8
en5af
8enal
en5all
en7alm
en3alt
en1am
en3an.
en3ant
en1a6p
en1ar
en1a6s
6e1nat
en3auf
en3aus
en2ce
enda6l
end5erf
end5erg
en8d7ess
en7dor
7endsp
4ene.
en7ech
en5eck
e8neff
e6n5ehr
en7ei.
e6n5eim
en3eis
e8nelt
6enem.
6enen
4ener.
e8nerd
7e4nerg
en5e6ro
en5erw
6enes
e8nesk
e6n5ess
e2n7ex
en3glo
8enhar
2eni
enks6
en7na
enni6s5
ennos4
enns8
e1no
e6nober
en7odi
en7o8f
en5opf
e4n3ord
en4san
en7sche
en8s7ers
en7s8kl
en5s6por
enst7al
en5t6ag
enta5go
ent7erbu
entia8n
en6tid
3entla
ent8rea
ent5ric
ent7rol
5entwu
e3ny
en7ye
en8zan
eo1c
e5o6fe
e8o7g
eo7i8d
e7ol.
e1on.
e7onb
e7ond
e3onf
